Utah statutes.
63B-10-113.   Certification of satisfaction of conditions precedent -- Conclusiveness.

(1)  The commission may not issue any bond under this chapter until it finds and certifies that all conditions precedent to issuance of the bonds have been satisfied.

(2)  A recital on any bond of this finding and certification conclusively establishes the completion and satisfaction of all these conditions.



Enacted by Chapter 321, 2001 General Session

